Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.09.050

Publication of proposed charter.

The proposed new, altered, or revised charter shall be published in the newspaper having the largest general circulation within the city at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the electors for their approval.

[ 1985 c 469 s 41; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.09.050.]